Maine, session 132, LD2232.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Credit of funds for county jails for jail operations costs.
Notwithstanding the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, section 1532, in fiscal year 2025-26,
prior to the credit of any investment earnings on the Maine Budget Stabilization Fund, the
State Controller shall first credit $4,000,000 of investment earnings to the County Jail
Operations Fund, Other Special Revenue Funds account in the Department of Corrections
for distributions to counties for jail operations costs.
Sec. 2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
CORRECTIONS, DEPARTMENT OF
County Jail Operations Fund Z227
Initiative: Provides a one-time allocation to the County Jail Operations Fund for
distribution to counties for jail operations costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,000,000 $0
__________ __________
Page 1 - 132LR3072(05)

OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $4,000,000 $0
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR3072(05)